Hawaii statutes.
[§302A-1510] Sustainable schools
initiative. (a) The department shall establish a goal of becoming
net-zero with respect to energy use, producing as much renewable energy as the
department consumes across all public school facilities, by January 1, 2035.

(b) The department shall use the amount and
value of energy consumed by the department across all public school facilities
during the 2015-2016 fiscal year as the benchmark for measuring the
department's progress toward the energy usage goal set forth in subsection (a).

(c) The department shall submit an annual
report that shall include information on:

(1) The overall progress toward the net-zero energy
goal set forth in subsection (a);

(2) Its plans and recommendations to advance the
net-zero energy goal set forth in subsection (a); and

(3) Any challenges or barriers encountered or
anticipated by the department in meeting the net-zero energy goal set forth in
subsection (a).

(d) The department shall expedite the cooling
of all public school classrooms to a temperature acceptable for student
learning. When implementing classroom cooling measures, the department, and
any contractor hired to implement classroom cooling measures, shall maximize
energy efficiency and installation and operating cost savings over the entire
life of the project.

(e) Pursuant to this section, the department
shall include in the report the status of the implementation of measures taken
to cool public school classrooms as required by subsection (d). The report
shall include the following information:

(1) The number of completed classrooms in which
cooling measures were implemented and the number of classrooms remaining that
require cooling;

(2) The different types of cooling measures
implemented;

(3) The approximate cost per classroom for planned
cooling measures, including installation, upgrades, equipment, maintenance, and
projected operating costs over the life of the installed cooling measures;

(4) The approximate cost per completed classroom for
cooling measures implemented, including installation, upgrades, equipment,
maintenance, and projected operating costs over the life of the installed
cooling measures;

(5) The number of completed classrooms in which
energy efficiency measures were installed or implemented and the number of
classrooms remaining that require energy efficiency measures; and

(6) The different types of energy efficiency measures
installed or implemented.

(f) The department shall report its findings
and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no
later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session. [L 2016, c 176, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next